ja: スライド取り付けタイプ: デッキマウント; プラットフォームマウント; プレイセットアタッチメントマウント; スタンドアロン/自立式; ブランコセットアタッチメント; その他
es: Tipo de instalación del tobogán: Montaje en terraza; Montaje en plataforma; Montaje en zona de juegos; Independiente; Accesorio para columpio; Otro
de: Montageart der Rutsche: Deckmontage; Plattformmontage; Montage als Spielturmanbau; Eigenständig/Freistehend; Schaukelanbau; Andere
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt máng trượt: Gắn trên sàn; Gắn trên bục; Gắn với bộ đồ chơi; Độc lập; Gắn với xích đu; Khác
fi: Liukumäen asennustyyppi: Kansiasennus; Tasoasennus; Leikkikeskuksen lisäosa; Erillinen/vapaasti seisova; Keinutelineen lisäosa; Muu
en: Slide installation type: Deck mount; Platform mount; Playset attachment mount; Standalone/freestanding; Swing set attachment; Other
ko: 슬라이드 설치 유형: 데크 마운트; 플랫폼 마운트; 플레이셋 부착용 마운트; 스탠드얼론/프리스탠딩; 그네 세트 부착물; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de instalare a toboganului: Montare pe terasă; Montare pe platformă; Atașament pentru loc de joacă; Independent/de sine stătător; Atașament pentru leagăn; Altul
tr: Kaydırak kurulum tipi: Zemin montajı; Platform montajı; Oyun seti eklenti montajı; Bağımsız; Salıncak seti eklentisi; Diğer
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης οδηγού: Τοποθέτηση σε κατάστρωμα; Τοποθέτηση σε πλατφόρμα; Προσάρτηση σε σετ παιχνιδιού; Αυτόνομο/ελεύθερης τοποθέτησης; Προσάρτηση σε κούνια; Άλλο
cs: Typ instalace pojezdu: Montáž na plošinu; Montáž na podestu; Montáž k hrací sestavě; Samostatně stojící; Montáž na houpačku; Jiný
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на пързалка: Монтаж на платформа; Монтаж на площадка; Монтаж към детска площадка; Самостоятелна/свободностояща; Монтаж към люлка; Друг
sv: Typ av installation för skena: Däcksmontering; Plattformsmontering; Montering på lekställning; Fristående; Montering på gungställning; Övrigt
zh-CN: 滑梯安装类型: 底座安装; 木板平台安装; 游乐设施附加安装; 独立式; 秋千附加安装; 其他
it: Tipo di installazione dello scivolo: Montaggio a ponte; Montaggio su piattaforma; Montaggio su area giochi; Indipendente; Montaggio su altalena; Altro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งสไลเดอร์: ติดตั้งบนระเบียง; ติดตั้งบนแพลตฟอร์ม; ติดตั้งกับชุดเครื่องเล่น; ตั้งพื้นอิสระ; ติดตั้งกับชุดชิงช้า; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta ugradnje klizača: Montaža na pod; Montaža na platformu; Montaža kao priključak za igralište; Samostojeći; Montaža kao priključak za ljuljačku; Ostalo
da: Installationstype for rutsjebane: Dækmontering; Platformmontering; Montering til legestativ; Selvstændig/fritstående; Montering til gyngestativ; Andet
ru: Тип установки горки: Крепление к настилу; Крепление к платформе; Крепление к игровому комплексу; Отдельностоящая; Крепление к качелям; Другое
zh-TW: 滑梯安裝類型: 露台安裝; 平台安裝; 遊戲設施配件安裝; 獨立式/自立式; 鞦韆組配件安裝; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve tobogana: Namestitev na površino; Namestitev na ploščad; Pritrditev na igralo; Samostojno/prostostoječe; Pritrditev na gugalnico; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do escorrega: Montagem em convés; Montagem em plataforma; Montagem de acessório em estrutura de brincar; Independente; Acessório de baloiço; Outro
hu: Csúszda beszerelésének típusa: Fedélzetre szerelhető; Platformra szerelhető; Játéktoronyhoz rögzíthető; Önálló/szabadon álló; Hintához rögzíthető; Egyéb
nl: Installatietype glijbaan: Dekmontage; Platformmontage; Speeltoestelmontage; Vrijstaand; Schommelmontage; Overig
nb: Installasjonstype for sklie: Dekkmontering; Plattformmontering; Feste for lekesett; Frittstående; Feste for huskestativ; Annet
sk-SK: Typ montáže posuvných prvkov: Montáž na plošinu; Montáž na podstavu; Pripojenie na hernú zostavu; Voľne stojace; Pripojenie na hojdačku; Iné
pt-BR: Escorregador, tipo de instalação: Montagem em deck; Montagem em plataforma; Montagem fixada em playground; Independente/autônomo; Fixação em balanço; Outra
lt-LT: Čiuožyklų įrengimo tipas: Tvirtinamas prie platformos (denio); Tvirtinamas prie platformos; Tvirtinamas prie žaidimų aikštelės; Atskiras / pastatomas; Tvirtinamas prie sūpynių rinkinio; Kita
pl: Typ montażu zjeżdżalni: Montaż do pokładu / platformy; Montaż do platformy; Montaż jako dodatek do placu zabaw; Wolnostojąca; Montaż do zestawu huśtawek; Inne
fr: Type d'installation par glissement: Montage sur plateforme; Montage sur estrade; Fixation pour portique de jeux; Autonome/sur pied; Fixation pour balançoire; Autre